Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-407
Warrant; persons who may execute.

The magistrate issuing any such warrant may make an order thereon authorizing a person to be named in such warrant to execute the warrant. The person named in such order may execute such warrant anywhere in the state by apprehending and conveying such offender before the magistrate issuing such warrant or before some other magistrate of the same county. All sheriffs, coroners, and others when required in their respective counties shall aid and assist in the execution of such warrant.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 289, p. 790;

R.S.1913, § 8943;

C.S.1922, § 9967;

C.S.1929, § 29-407;

R.S.1943, § 29-407;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 25.

Warrant for arrest may be executed within any county in the state. State v. Clingerman, 180 Neb. 344, 142 N.W.2d 765 (1966).